Utah statutes.
62A-4a-905.   Supplemental adoption assistance.
(1)  The division may, based upon annual legislative appropriations for
adoption assistance and division rules, provide supplemental adoption
assistance for children who have a special need.  Supplemental adoption
assistance shall be provided only after all other resources for which a  child
is eligible have been exhausted.
(2) (a)  The department shall, by rule, establish in each region at least one
advisory committee to review and make recommendations to the division on
individual requests for supplemental adoption assistance.  The committee shall
be comprised of the following members:
(i)  an adoption expert;
(ii)  an adoptive parent;
(iii)  a division representative;
(iv)  a foster parent; and
(v)  an adoption caseworker.
(b)  The division policy required in Subsection (1) shall include a provision
which establishes a threshold amount for requests for supplemental adoption
assistance that require review by the committee established in this Subsection
(2).
